yua.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

%{V%}

%<v%>    ! Verbo

%<n%>    ! Sustantivo
%<adj%>  ! Adjetivo
%<pl%>   ! Plural
%<s_pl%>   ! Sujeto Plural

%<prx%>  ! Proximal 'this _'
%<med%>  ! Medial 'that _'
%<dst%>  ! Distal 'that _ over there'

%<incomp%> ! "ongoing incomplete"
%<past%> ! "Completed simple past"
%<perf%> ! "Completed Present Perfect"
%<subjun%> ! "Subjunctive"
%<pron%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3sg_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<1pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<2pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"
%<3pl_poss%>  ! "pronoun"

%<poss_nonownership%>
%<poss_comm%>
%<poss_internal%>

%<poss%>  ! "posesivo"


%<hab%>

%<neg%>

%<ipfv%> ! imperfectivo "Ongoing incomplete"
%<pfv%>  ! perfectivo "Simple Past"
%<pf%>   ! perfect "Completed Present"
%<subj%>  ! subjunctive
%<s_sg%> ! sujeto singular
%<imp%>  ! imperativo
%<s_pl%> ! sujeto plural

%<s_sg1%>
%<s_sg2%>
%<s_sg3%>
%<s_pl1%>
%<s_pl2%>
%<s_pl3%>

%<o_sg1%>
%<o_sg2%>
%<o_sg3%>
%<o_pl1%>
%<o_pl2%>
%<o_pl3%>

%<female_agentive%>
%<male_agentive%>

%<tv%>            !
%<iv%>            ! 

%<attr%>          ! Attributive
%<der_l%>         ! Adjective derivation
%<term%>          ! Terminative morpheme
%<top%>          ! Topicalized
%<loc%>           ! locative

%{o%}             ! Either 'o' or nothing
%{e%}             ! Either 'e' or nothing
%{V%}             ! Copy stem vowel
%{wy%}          ! start to vowel-initial verb stems either y- or w- depending on person of subject.

ʼ                ! Glottal, U+02BC
%>                ! Morpheme boundary

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
CvcTrans ;
IntransReg ;
SetA ;
PronombresIndependientes ;

LEXICON SetA
%<s_sg1%>%<pron%>:in # ;
%<s_sg1%>%<pron%>%<hab%>:kin # ;
%<s_sg1%>%<pron%>%<dur%>:tin # ;

%<s_sg2%>%<pron%>:a # ;
%<s_sg2%>%<pron%>%<hab%>:ka # ;
%<s_sg1%>%<pron%>%<dur%>:tan # ;


%<s_sg3%>%<pron%>:u # ;
%<s_sg3%>%<pron%>%<hab%>:ku # ;
%<s_pl1%>%<pron%>:k # ;
%<s_pl2%>%<pron%>:a # ;
%<s_pl3%>%<pron%>:u # ;
%<1sg_poss%>%<pron%>:in # ;
%<2sg_poss%>%<pron%>:a # ;
%<3sg_poss%>%<pron%>:u # ;
%<1pl_poss%>%<pron%>:k # ;
%<2pl_poss%>%<pron%>:a # ;
%<3pl_poss%>%<pron%>:u # ;

LEXICON PronombresIndependientes
%<1sg_poss%>%<pron%>:téen Topicalizer ;

LEXICON Topicalizer
%<top%>:e' # ;
Terminatives ;

LEXICON TransitiveSetB
%<o_sg1%>:en%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_pl1%>:o'on%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_sg2%>:ech%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_pl2%>:e'ex%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_sg1%>:en%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_sg3%>:0%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_sg3%>:ih%> PluralSubjSuffix ;
%<o_pl3%>:o'ob%> PluralSubjSuffix ;

LEXICON IntransitiveSetB
%<s_sg1%>:en Terminatives ;
%<s_pl1%>:o'on Terminatives ;
%<s_sg2%>:ech Terminatives ;
%<s_pl2%>:e'ex Terminatives ;
%<s_sg1%>:en Terminatives ;
%<s_sg3%>:0 Terminatives ;
%<s_pl3%>:o'ob Terminatives ;

LEXICON PluralSubjSuffix
%<s_pl%>:o'ob%> Terminatives ;
%<s_pl%>:e'ex%> Terminatives ;
Terminatives ;

LEXICON Terminatives
%<neg%>:i' # ;
%<loc%>:i' # ;
# ;

LEXICON RegIntransVozActivaSinL
%<ipfv%>:0%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:0%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:aha'an%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:nen%> Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:nene'ex%> Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransVozActivaConL
%<ipfv%>:%{V%}l%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:0%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:aha'an%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:nen%> Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:nene'ex%> Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransDvT
%<ipfv%>:ik%> TransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:ah%> TransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:mah%> TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:0%> TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:eh%> Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2sg%>:0%> Terminatives;
%<imp%>%<s_2pl%>:0%> PluralSubjSuffix;

LEXICON RegIntransDvTVozPasiva
%<ipfv%>:a'al%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:a'ab%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:a'an%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:a'ak%> InstransitiveSetB;

! TODO: check on this....what's the plural ending?
%<imp%>:a'ak%> Terminatives;

LEXICON RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva
%<ipfv%>:ah%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:ahnah%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:ahnaha'an%> InstransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:ahnak%> InstransitiveSetB;

! TODO: check on this....what's the plural ending?
%<imp%>:ahnak%> Terminatives;

LEXICON TransVozActiva
%<ipfv%>:ik%> TransitiveSetB;
%<pfv%>:ah%> TransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:mah%> TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_sg%>:0%> TransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_pl%>:eh%> TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_sg%>:0%> TransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_pl%>:eh%> TransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozAntipasiva
%<ipfv%>:0%> PluralSubjSuffix;

! TODO: for all of the following entries, the geminate "n%>n -> n"
%<pfv%>:nah%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:naha'an%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_sg%>:nak%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>%<s_pl%>:eh%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_sg%>:nen%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>%<s_pl%>:nene'ex%> IntransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozPasiva
%<ipfv%>:%{V%}l%> PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:a'ab%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:a'an%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:%{V%}k%> IntransitiveSetB;

LEXICON TransVozMedia
%<ipfv%>:%{V%}l%> PluralSubjSuffix;
%<pfv%>:0%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<pf%>:a'an%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<subj%>:%{V%}k%> IntransitiveSetB;
%<imp%>:0%> IntransitiveSetB;

LEXICON IntransReg
bin%<v%>%<iv%>:bin%> RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
bin%<v%>%<tv%>:bis%> RegIntransDvT ;
bin%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:bins%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
bin%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bins%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
tal%<v%>%<iv%>:tal%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
tal%<v%>%<tv%>:tas%> RegIntransDvT ;
tal%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:tas%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
tal%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:tas%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
máan%<v%>%<iv%>:máan%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
máan%<v%>%<tv%>:máans%> RegIntransDvT ;
máan%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:máans%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
máan%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:máans%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
wen%<v%>%<iv%>:wen%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
wen%<v%>%<tv%>:wens%> RegIntransDvT ;
wen%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:wens%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
wen%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:wens%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ah%<v%>%<iv%>:%{wy%}ah%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
ah%<v%>%<tv%>:%{wy%}ahs%> RegIntransDvT ;
ah%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:%{wy%}ahs%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ah%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:%{wy%}ahs%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ts'o'ok%<v%>%<iv%>:ts'o'ok%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
ts'o'ok%<v%>%<tv%>:ts'o'oks%> RegIntransDvT ;
ts'o'ok%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ts'o'oks%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ts'o'ok%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ts'o'oks%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
núuk%<v%>%<iv%>:núuk%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
núuk%<v%>%<tv%>:núuk%> RegIntransDvT ;
núuk%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:núuks%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
núuk%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:núuks%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ok%<v%>%<iv%>:ok%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
ok%<v%>%<tv%>:oks%> RegIntransDvT ;
ok%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:oks%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ok%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:oks%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
hóok%<v%>%<iv%>:hóok%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
hóok%<v%>%<tv%>:hóoks%> RegIntransDvT ;
hóok%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:hóoks%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
hóok%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:hóoks%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
báab%<v%>%<iv%>:báab%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
báab%<v%>%<tv%>:báabs%> RegIntransDvT ;
báab%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:báabs%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
báab%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:báabs%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<iv%>:ichkíil%> RegIntransVozActivaSinL ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<tv%>:ichkíilt%> RegIntransDvT ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ichkíilt%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
ichkíil%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ichkíilt%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
líik%<v%>%<iv%>:líik%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
líik%<v%>%<tv%>:líiks%> RegIntransDvT ;
líik%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:líiks%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
líik%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:líiks%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
éem%<v%>%<iv%>:éem%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
éem%<v%>%<tv%>:éems%> RegIntransDvT ;
éem%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:éems%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
éem%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:éems%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
lúub%<v%>%<iv%>:lúub%> RegIntransVozActivaConL ;
lúub%<v%>%<tv%>:lúubs%> RegIntransDvT ;
lúub%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:lúubs%> RegIntransDvTVozPasiva ;
lúub%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:lúubs%> RegIntransDvTVozAntipasiva ;
LEXICON CvcTrans
buh%<v%>%<tv%>:buh%> TransVozActiva ;
buh%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bùuh%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
buh%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:bu'uh%> TransVozPasiva ;
buh%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:búuh%> TransVozMedia ;
buk%<v%>%<tv%>:buk%> TransVozActiva ;
buk%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bùuk%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
buk%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:bu'uk%> TransVozPasiva ;
buk%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:búuk%> TransVozMedia ;
bul%<v%>%<tv%>:bul TransVozActiva ;
bul%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:bùul%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
bul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:bu'ul%> TransVozPasiva ;
bul%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:búul%> TransVozMedia ;
ch'in%<v%>%<tv%>:ch'in TransVozActiva ;
ch'in%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ch'ìin%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
ch'in%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ch'i'in%> TransVozPasiva ;
ch'in%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:ch'íin%> TransVozMedia ;
ch'ul%<v%>%<tv%>:ch'ul TransVozActiva ;
ch'uy%<v%>%<tv%>:ch'uy TransVozActiva ;
ch'uy%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ch'ùuy%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
ch'uy%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ch'u'uy%> TransVozPasiva ;
ch'uy%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:ch'úuy%> TransVozMedia ;
hay%<v%>%<tv%>:hay TransVozActiva ;
hay%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:háay%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
hay%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ha'ay%> TransVozPasiva ;
hay%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:hàay%> TransVozMedia ;
hup%<v%>%<tv%>:hup TransVozActiva ;
hup%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:húup%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
hup%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:hu'up%> TransVozPasiva ;
hup%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:hùup%> TransVozMedia ;
kan%<v%>%<tv%>:kan TransVozActiva ;
kan%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:káan%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
kan%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ka'an%> TransVozPasiva ;
kan%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:kàan%> TransVozMedia ;
kon%<v%>%<tv%>:kon TransVozActiva ;
kon%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:kóon%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
kon%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ko'on%> TransVozPasiva ;
kon%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:kòon%> TransVozMedia ;
mach’%<v%>%<tv%>:mach’ TransVozActiva ;
mach’%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:máach’%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
mach’%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ma'ach’%> TransVozPasiva ;
mach’%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:màach’%> TransVozMedia ;
man%<v%>%<tv%>:man TransVozActiva ;
man%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:máan%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
man%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ma'an%> TransVozPasiva ;
man%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:màan%> TransVozMedia ;
p’ak%<v%>%<tv%>:p’ak TransVozActiva ;
p’ak%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:p’áak%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
p’ak%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:p’a'ak%> TransVozPasiva ;
p’ak%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:p’àak%> TransVozMedia ;
p’is%<v%>%<tv%>:p’is TransVozActiva ;
p’is%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:p’íis%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
p’is%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:p’i'is%> TransVozPasiva ;
p’is%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:p’ìis%> TransVozMedia ;
poch’%<v%>%<tv%>:poch’ TransVozActiva ;
poch’%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:póoch’%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
poch’%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:po'och’%> TransVozPasiva ;
poch’%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:pòoch’%> TransVozMedia ;
t’ul%<v%>%<tv%>:t’ul TransVozActiva ;
t’ul%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:t’úul%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
t’ul%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:t’u'ul%> TransVozPasiva ;
t’ul%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:t’ùul%> TransVozMedia ;
top%<v%>%<tv%>:top TransVozActiva ;
top%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:tóop%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
top%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:to'op%> TransVozPasiva ;
top%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:tòop%> TransVozMedia ;
ts’il%<v%>%<tv%>:ts’il TransVozActiva ;
ts’il%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:ts’íil%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
ts’il%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:ts’i'il%> TransVozPasiva ;
ts’il%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:ts’ìil%> TransVozMedia ;
wix%<v%>%<tv%>:wix TransVozActiva ;
wix%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:wíix%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
wix%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:wi'ix%> TransVozPasiva ;
wix%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:wìix%> TransVozMedia ;
xok%<v%>%<tv%>:xok TransVozActiva ;
xok%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:xóok%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
xok%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:xo'ok%> TransVozPasiva ;
xok%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:xòok%> TransVozMedia ;
xot’%<v%>%<tv%>:xot’ TransVozActiva ;
xot’%<v%>%<iv%>%<aps%>:xóot’%> TransVozAntipasiva ;
xot’%<v%>%<iv%>%<pss%>:xo'ot’%> TransVozPasiva ;
xot’%<v%>%<iv%>%<mv%>:xòot’%> TransVozMedia ;
